California, session 20252026, SB364.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5367 is added to the Business and Professions Code, immediately following Section 5366, to read:5367. The department shall not deny or delay the acceptance of a permit application for a new advertising display along a portion of a new alignment of an interstate or primary highway on the basis that the highway project has not been accepted by the department as complete if the section of highway is open to the use of the public for vehicular travel within 1,000 feet of the location specified in the permit application.